Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.900

Rights may not be waived—Construction—1992 c 223.

(1) The rights provided in chapter 223, Laws of 1992 may not be waived by the parties and a contract provision that provides for waiver of the rights provided in chapter 223, Laws of 1992 is void as against public policy.

(2) Chapter 223, Laws of 1992 is to be liberally construed to provide security for all parties intended to be protected by its provisions.

[ 1992 c 223 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 223: See note following RCW 39.76.011.

Application—1992 c 223: See RCW 39.04.901.